Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,100.01
Joint city-county building; authorized; acquisition of land; erect; equip, furnish, maintain, and operate.

Any county in this state may, together with any city of the first class of the county in which the county seat is located, jointly acquire land for, erect, equip, furnish, maintain, and operate a joint city-county building to be used jointly by such county and city.

Laws 1953, c. 32, § 1, p. 120.